Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 8 Retirement System — Administration

36-8-1.
Definition of terms.

The following words and phrases as used in chapters 8 to 10 of this title unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:

“Accumulated contributions” shall mean the sum of all the amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual pension account.

“Active member” shall mean any employee of the state of Rhode Island as defined in this section for whom the retirement system is currently receiving regular contributions pursuant to §§

36-10-1

and

36-10-1

.1.

“Actuarial equivalent” shall mean an allowance or benefit of equal value to any other allowance or benefit when computed upon the basis of the actuarial tables in use by the system.

“Annuity reserve” shall mean the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity, benefit, or retirement allowance granted under the provisions of chapter 10 of this title computed upon the basis of such mortality tables as shall be adopted from time to time by the retirement board with regular interest.

“Average compensation” for members eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009 shall mean the average of the highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation, within the total service when the average compensation was the highest. For members eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, “Average compensation” shall mean the average of the highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation within the total service when the average compensation was the highest.

For members who become eligible to retire on or after July 1, 2012, if more than one-half (1/2) of the member’s total years of service consist of years of service during which the member devoted less than thirty (30) business hours per week to the service of the state, but the member’s average compensation consists of three (3) or more years during which the member devoted more than thirty (30) business hours per week to the service of the state, such member’s average compensation shall mean the average of the highest ten (10) consecutive years of compensation within the total service when the average compensation was the highest; provided however, effective July 1, 2015, if such member’s average compensation as defined in subsection (a) Above is equal to or less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), such amount to be indexed annually in accordance with §

36-10-35(h)(1)(B)

, such member’s average compensation shall mean the greater of: (i) The average of the highest ten (10) consecutive years of compensation within the total service when the average compensation was the highest; or (ii) The member’s average compensation as defined in subsection (a) above. To protect a member’s accrued benefit on June 30, 2012 under this §

36-8-1(5)(b)

, in no event shall a member’s average compensation be lower than his or her average compensation determined as of June 30, 2012.

“Beneficiary” shall mean any person in receipt of a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, or other benefit as provided by chapter 10 of this title.

“Casual employee” shall mean those persons hired for a temporary period, a period of emergency or an occasional period.

“Compensation” as used in chapters 8 — 10 of this title, chapters 16 and 17 of title 16, and chapter 21 of title 45 shall mean salary or wages earned and paid for the performance of duties for covered employment, including regular longevity or incentive plans approved by the board, but shall not include payments made for overtime or any other reason other than performance of duties, including but not limited to the types of payments listed below:

Payments contingent on the employee having terminated or died;

Payments made at termination for unused sick leave, vacation leave, or compensatory time;

Payments contingent on the employee terminating employment at a specified time in the future to secure voluntary retirement or to secure release of an unexpired contract of employment;

Individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the employee’s retirement;

Additional payments for performing temporary or extra duties beyond the normal or regular work day or work year.

“Employee” shall mean any officer or employee of the state of Rhode Island whose business time is devoted exclusively to the services of the state, but shall not include one whose duties are of a casual or seasonal nature. The retirement board shall determine who are employees within the meaning of this chapter. The governor of the state, the lieutenant governor, the secretary of state, the attorney general, the general treasurer, and the members of the general assembly, ex officio, shall not be deemed to be employees within the meaning of that term unless and until they elect to become members of the system as provided in §

36-9-6

, but in no case shall it deem as an employee, for the purposes of this chapter, any individual who devotes less than twenty (20) business hours per week to the service of the state, and who receives less than the equivalent of minimum wage compensation on an hourly basis for his or her services, except as provided in §

36-9-24

. Any commissioner of a municipal housing authority or any member of a part-time state, municipal or local board, commission, committee or other public authority shall not be deemed to be an employee within the meaning of this chapter.

“Full actuarial costs” or “full actuarial value” shall mean the lump sum payable by a member claiming service credit for certain employment for which that payment is required which is determined according to the age of the member and the employee’s annual rate of compensation at the time he or she applies for service credit and which is expressed as a rate percent of the employee’s annual rate of compensation to be multiplied by the number of years for which he or she claims service credit as prescribed in a schedule adopted by the retirement board from time to time on the basis of computation by the actuary. Except as provided in §§

16-16-7.1

,

36-5-3

,

36-9-31

,

36-10-10.4

,

45-21-53

,

36-10-8

,

45-21-29

,

8-3-16(c)

,

8-8-10.1(c)

,

42-28-22.1(d)

and

28-30-18.1(c)

:

all service credit purchases requested after June 16, 2009 and prior to July 1, 2012, shall be at full actuarial value; and

all service credit purchases requested after June 30, 2012 shall be at full actuarial value which shall be determined using the system’s assumed investment rate of return minus one percent (1%).

The rules applicable to a service credit purchase shall be the rules of the retirement system in effect at the time the purchase application is submitted to the retirement system.

“Funded ratio” shall mean the ratio of the actuarial value of assets to the actuarial accrued liability consistent with the funding policy of the retirement board as defined in §

36-8-4

.

“Inactive member” shall mean a member who has withdrawn from service as an employee but who has not received a refund of contributions.

“Members” shall mean any person included in the membership of the retirement system as provided in §§

36-9-1

—

36-9-7

.

“Prior service” shall mean service as a member rendered before July 1, 1936, certified on his or her prior service certificate and allowable as provided in §

36-9-28

.

“Regular interest” shall mean interest at the assumed investment rate of return, compounded annually, as may be prescribed from time to time by the retirement board.

“Retirement allowance” shall mean annual payments for life made after retirement under and in accordance with chapters 8 to 10 of this title. All allowances shall be paid in equal monthly installments beginning as of the effective date thereof; provided, that a smaller pro rata amount may be paid for part of a month where separation from service occurs during the month in which the application was filed, and when the allowance ceases before the last day of the month.

“Retirement board” or “board” shall mean the board provided in §

36-8-3

to administer the retirement system.

“Retirement system” shall mean the employees’ retirement system of the state of Rhode Island as defined in §

36-8-2

.

“Service” shall mean service as an employee of the state of Rhode Island as described in subdivision (9) of this section.

“Social Security retirement age” shall mean a member’s full retirement age as determined in accordance with the federal Old Age, Survivors and Disability Insurance Act, not to exceed age sixty-seven (67).

“Total service” shall mean prior service as defined above, plus service rendered as a member on or after July 1, 1936.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3201, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 151, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 27; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 12, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 1.

36-8-2.
Establishment of system.

A retirement system is hereby established and placed under the management of the retirement board for the purpose of providing retirement allowances for employees of the state of Rhode Island under the provisions of chapters 8 — 10 of this title. The retirement system so created shall begin operation as of July 1, 1936. It shall have the power and privileges of a corporation and shall be known as the “employees’ retirement system of the state of Rhode Island”, and by that name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its funds invested, and all of its cash, securities, and other property held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-2

.

36-8-3.
Responsibility for administration — Rules and regulations.

The general administration and the responsibility for the proper operation of the retirement system and for making effective the provisions of chapters 8 — 10 of this title are hereby vested in a retirement board. The retirement board shall, from time to time, establish rules and regulations for the administration and transaction of the business of the retirement system. Rules and regulations which have been or may be established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be compiled, codified, and published so that they shall be generally available to the members of the system. The retirement board shall also perform such other functions as are required for the execution of chapters 8 — 10 of this title. The board shall also establish rules and regulations to govern the provisions of §§

8-3-16

,

8-3-17

,

8-8-10.1

,

8-8-10.2

,

8-8.2-7

,

8-8.2-8

,

28-30-18.1

,

28-30-18.2

,

42-28-22.1

, and

42-28-22.2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-3

; P.L. 1976, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 494, § 11.

36-8-3.1.
Immunity of board members.

The members of the retirement board shall be immune from suit in any civil action for negligence based on any official act or statement performed or made in good faith in the course of their duties as set out in §

36-8-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 191, § 1.

36-8-4.
Composition of retirement board.

There is hereby authorized, created and established in the office of the general treasurer an independent retirement board which shall hold and administer, in trust, the funds of the retirement system in accordance with the provisions of chapters 8 — 10 of this title and shall perform such functions as authorized by law. The membership of the retirement board shall consist of: the general treasurer or his or her designee who shall be a subordinate within the general treasurer’s office; the director of administration or his or her designee who shall be a subordinate within the department of administration; a representative of the budget office or his or her designee from within the budget office, who shall be appointed by the director of administration; the president of the league of cities and towns or his or her designee; two (2) active state employee members of the retirement system or officials from state employee unions to be elected by active state employees; two (2) active teacher members of the retirement system or officials from a teachers union to be elected by active teachers; one active municipal employee member of the retirement system or an official from a municipal employees union to be elected by active municipal employees; two (2) retired members of the retirement system to be elected by retired members of the system; and four (4) public members, all of whom shall be competent by training or experience in the field of finance, accounting or pensions; two (2) of the public members shall be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall serve an initial term of three (3) years and one of whom shall serve an initial term of four (4) years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified; and two (2) of the public members shall be appointed by the general treasurer, one of whom shall serve an initial term of three (3) years and one of whom shall serve an initial term of four (4) years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter, the term of these four (4) public members shall be for four (4) years or until their successors are appointed and qualified. Meetings shall be open to the public in accordance with the provisions of chapter 42-46 of the general laws. Any member of the general public who was appointed by the governor prior to July 4, 2006 shall continue to serve until such time as a successor is appointed and qualified. Any member who was elected prior to July 4, 2006 shall serve for the remainder of his or her elected term.

Meetings shall be held at such place as may be designated in the call of the meeting, provided at no cost to the state, at least monthly at the call of the chair.

The elected members of the retirement board shall be seated by the following procedure:

Each candidate for a position on the board must have one hundred (100) signatures of members of their respective group.

The term of office for elected members shall be for four (4) years, and election of their successors shall be given by the board prior to the expiration of the terms of the incumbent elected members.

By petition for recall of twenty percent (20%) of the respective membership of the various groups a new election shall be ordered by the retirement board.

All gubernatorial and general treasurer appointments made under this section after July 4, 2006 shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state.

Public members of the board shall be removable by the chair for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

Newly appointed and qualified public members shall, within six (6) months of their appointment, attend a training course that shall be developed and provided by the office of the general treasurer and shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2 of the Rhode Island general laws, the retirement statutes; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of July 4, 2006 prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; P.L. 1949, ch. 2376, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2910, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3619, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-4

; P.L. 1972, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 598, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 27.

36-8-4.1.
Fiduciary and continuing education requirements.

A member of the board shall discharge duties with respect to the retirement system:

Solely in the interest of the participants and beneficiaries;

For the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to participants and beneficiaries and paying reasonable expenses of administering the system;

With the care, skill, and caution under the circumstances then prevailing which a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with those matters would use in the conduct of an activity of like character and purpose;

Impartially, taking into account any differing interests of participants and beneficiaries;

Incurring only costs that are appropriate and reasonable; and

In accordance with a good-faith interpretation of the law governing the retirement system.

The retirement board shall establish mandatory continuing education requirements for members of the board.

In the event the retirement board takes any action(s) contrary to the recommendation of the plan actuary, the executive director shall within thirty (30) days, provide notice of such action(s) to all plan members, the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate. The notice shall also be posted electronically on the retirement board’s website.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 3.

36-8-5.
Vacancies on board.

If, for any reason whatsoever, there shall be a vacancy in the office of an appointed member of the board the appointing authority shall appoint a successor within seventy (70) days for the balance of the vacated term; provided, however, that all gubernatorial and general treasurer appointments made under this section after July 4, 2006 shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate. If, for any reason whatsoever, there shall be a vacancy in the office of an elected member of the board the seat shall be filled by a new election of the respective group within seventy (70) days for the balance of the vacated term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-5

; P.L. 1976, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 27.

36-8-6.
Votes of board — Record of proceedings.

Each member of the board shall be entitled to one vote. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum and all actions of the board shall be a majority vote of the members present and voting at which a quorum is present. The board shall keep a record of all the proceedings which shall be open to public inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-6

; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 4.

36-8-7.
Reimbursement of board members.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for any necessary expenditures and no employee shall suffer any loss of salary or wages through serving upon the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-7

.

36-8-8.
Annual report and statement.

The retirement board shall submit to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate and the secretary of state, on or before the first day of December in each year, an annual report showing the financial transactions of the system for the fiscal year of the state next preceding said date. The report shall contain, among other things, a financial balance sheet, a statement of income and expenditures, a valuation balance sheet as prepared by the actuary, a detailed statement of investments acquired and disposed of during the year, and such other statistical data as are deemed necessary for a proper interpretation of the condition of the system and the results of its operations. The report shall also provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, meeting minutes if requested, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all the funds received and expended including the source of funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the board; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to §

36-8-4

; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the general assembly and the secretary of state’s website as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

of the Rhode Island general laws. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision. The report shall also embody such other data as may be of use in the advancement of knowledge concerning state employee pensions and any recommendations of the board for changes in the laws pertaining to the system. The retirement board shall cause to be published for distribution among the members of the system a financial statement summarizing the results of operations for the fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-8

; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 4.

36-8-8.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 4, effective November 18, 2011.

36-8-8.2.
Special pension benefits.

No law shall be enacted conferring special pension benefits upon any individual or group of individuals unless this section is specifically repealed.

The retirement board shall take no administrative action conferring special benefits upon any individual or group of individuals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 139, § 9.

36-8-9.
Legal adviser — Treasurer — Executive officers and secretary.

There shall be a legal counsel to the board who shall be appointed by the general treasurer. The general treasurer shall be ex-officio chairperson and treasurer of the retirement board and he or she shall be responsible for appointing the custodian of the funds. There shall also be an executive director who shall be appointed by the retirement board. The executive director shall be in charge of administration of the retirement system and shall serve as secretary to the retirement board. In addition, the retirement board shall appoint an assistant director who shall serve as director and/or secretary in the absence of the director.

Any negotiated agreement entered into after June 1, 1992, between any state or municipal agency or department and an employee or employees, whose conditions are contrary to the general laws or the rules, regulations, and policies as adopted and promulgated by the retirement board shall be null and void unless and until approved by formal action of the retirement board for good cause shown.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-9

; P.L. 1964, ch. 242, art. 8A, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 5.

36-8-10.
Accounts and statistical records — Clerical and professional assistance — Disbursements.

The general treasurer, under the direction and supervision of the retirement board, shall be charged with the establishment and maintenance of such accounts and statistical records as the retirement board may require and he or she shall employ such clerical assistance as shall be necessary to carry out properly the provisions of chapters 8 — 10 of this title. The retirement board shall secure the services of an actuary who shall be the actuarial advisor of the board and who shall make the actuarial computations and valuations required by chapters 8 — 10. The retirement board shall secure the services of such physicians as shall be necessary to make the medical examinations required by those chapters. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or sums as may from time to time be necessary, upon receipt by him or her of vouchers prepared and duly authenticated by the chief of the retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; P.L. 1937, ch. 2513, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-10

.

36-8-10.1.
Payment of administrative expense of the retirement board and maintaining the retirement system — Restricted receipts account.

There is hereby created a restricted receipt account, under the control of the general treasurer, the proceeds of which shall be used solely to pay the expenses of the retirement board, the cost of maintaining the retirement system, and the costs of administering the retirement system.

There shall be transferred to this restricted receipt account seventeen and one-half (17.5) basis points (0.175%), where one hundred (100.0) basis points equals one percent (1.0%), of the average total investments before lending activities as reported in the annual report of the auditor general for the next preceding five fiscal years. Any nonencumbered funds on June 30 of any fiscal year shall be credited to the employees’ retirement system of the state of Rhode Island and to the municipal employees’ retirement system of the state of Rhode Island in the same proportion as their contributions to the restricted receipt account established by this section during the fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 60, art. 1, § 5; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 25, § 1.

36-8-11.
Collection of actuarial and experience data.

The retirement board shall collect and keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for the preparation of the mortality and service tables and for the compilation of such other information as shall be required for the actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-11

.

36-8-12.
Actuarial investigations authorized by board.

Immediately after his or her selection, the actuary shall make such investigation of the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members as the retirement board shall authorize for the purpose of determining the proper tables to be prepared and submitted to the retirement board for adoption.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-12

.

36-8-13.
Periodic actuarial investigations and valuations — Adoption of tables and rates.

Every year beginning with the year 1976, the actuary shall make an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the retirement system, and shall make a valuation of the assets and liabilities of the system, and, taking into account the result of the investigation and valuation, the retirement board shall:

Adopt for the retirement system such mortality, service, and other tables as shall be deemed necessary; and

Certify the rates of contribution payable by the state of Rhode Island to carry out the provisions of chapters 8 — 10 of this title in accordance with the provisions of §

36-10-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-13

; P.L. 1976, ch. 289, § 1.

36-8-14.
Annual valuation of assets and liabilities.

On the basis of such tables as the retirement board shall adopt, the actuary shall make an annual valuation of the assets and liabilities of the funds of the system created by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-14

.

36-8-15.
Custody and investment of funds.

All money immediately required for the payment of retirement allowances or other benefits shall be deemed to be held in a trust under the laws of the state of Rhode Island with respect to which the general treasurer is designated the trustee in accordance with §

36-8-20(b)

. The trustee shall only invest these funds in accordance with the written objectives and guidelines established by the state investment commission pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10 of title 35 and other applicable law.

All money not immediately required for the payment of retirement allowances or other benefits shall be invested in accordance with the provisions of chapter 10 of title 35 and other applicable law and shall be held in a custodial or trust account in accordance with §

36-8-20(b)

.

By December 31, 1994, the trust and custodial account established under this section shall be maintained pursuant to written documents which expressly provide that it shall be impossible at any time prior to the satisfaction of all liabilities with respect to employees and their beneficiaries for any part of the corpus or income to be used for or diverted to purposes other than the payment of retirement allowances and other pension benefits to employees and their beneficiaries (except as otherwise permitted by §

36-8-20(b)

).

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 87, § 3.

36-8-16.
Disposition of investment earnings.

The retirement board shall credit all earned investment income from interest and dividends on investments and bank deposits during any fiscal year to the contingency reserve account.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-16

; P.L. 1980, ch. 57, § 1.

36-8-17.
Improper interest in investments of board.

Except as herein provided, no member of the board and no employee of the board shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in the gains or profits of any investment made by the retirement board, nor as such directly or indirectly receive any pay or emolument for his or her services. No member of the board or employee of the board shall, directly or indirectly, for himself or herself or as an agent, in any manner use the gains or profits, except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the retirement board; nor shall any member or employee of the board become an endorser or surety or become in any manner an obligor for money loaned or borrowed from the retirement board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-17

.

36-8-18.
Severability.

If any provision of chapters 8 — 10 of this title, any rule, or regulation made thereunder, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction the remainder of those chapters, rules, or regulations and the application of those provisions to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of those chapters shall not affect the validity of the remainder of those chapters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

36-8-18

.

36-8-19.
Annual audits.

The auditor general shall conduct upon the request of the retirement board a separate annual performance audit of the retirement system which shall include a report on the actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the retirement system. The auditor general may examine all records, files, and other documents, and evaluate all policies and procedures for purposes of conducting the audit. The aforementioned performance audit shall be in addition to the annual audit conducted by the auditor general of the financial statements of the retirement system. A copy of the report shall be given to the governor, the state retirement board, and the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 75, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 1.

36-8-20.
Internal Revenue Code qualification.

Intent. It is intended that the retirement system satisfy the requirements of § 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended from time to time, 26 U.S.C. § 401 (hereinafter referred to as the “code”), in form and operation, to the extent that those requirements apply to a governmental plan described in § 414(d) of the code, 26 U.S.C. § 414. To this end, the following provisions shall be applicable, administered, and interpreted in a manner consistent with maintaining the tax qualification of the retirement system, and shall supersede any conflicting provisions of chapters 8 — 10 of this title, of chapter 16 of title 16, or of chapter 21 of title 45.

Exclusive benefit. All funds of the retirement systems shall be held in one or more trusts, in one or more custodial accounts treated as trusts in accordance with § 401(f) of the code, or in a combination thereof. Under any trust or custodial account, it shall be impossible at any time prior to the satisfaction of all liabilities with respect to employees and their beneficiaries, for any part of the corpus or income to be used for, or diverted to, purposes other than the payment of retirement allowances and other pension benefits to employees and their beneficiaries. However, this requirement shall not prohibit: (1) the return of a contribution within six (6) months after the executive director determines that the contribution was made by a mistake of fact; or (2) the payment of expenses of the retirement system in accordance with applicable law.

Vesting on plan termination. In the event of the termination (within the meaning of the code) of the retirement system, the accrued benefits of eligible employees shall become fully and immediately vested but only to the extent those benefits are already funded.

Forfeitures. Credits forfeited by an employee pursuant to §

36-10-8

, §

16-16-31

, or §

45-21-28

shall not be applied to increase the benefits of any other employee.

Required distributions. Distributions shall begin to be made not later than the employee’s required beginning date as defined under § 401(a)(9) of the code and shall be made in accordance with all other requirements of that code section.

Limitation on benefits. Benefits shall not be payable to the extent that they exceed the limitations imposed by § 415 of the code, 26 U.S.C. § 415, as adjusted from time to time pursuant to § 415(d) of the code. In no event shall the member receive a retirement benefit in any year that exceeds the limitations set forth in § 415(b).

Limitation on compensation. Benefits and contributions shall not be computed with reference to any compensation that exceeds the maximum dollar amount permitted by § 401(a)(17) of the code as adjusted for increases in the cost-of-living. This provision shall take effect July 1, 1994, and shall apply only with respect to an employee who first becomes a member of the retirement system on or after that date.

Actuarial determination. Whenever the amount of any employee’s benefit is to be determined on the basis of actuarial assumptions done by a professional actuary, those assumptions shall be specified by resolution of the retirement board.

Direct rollovers. Any individual withdrawing any distribution from the retirement system which constitutes an “eligible rollover distribution” within the meaning of § 402(c) of the code, 26 U.S.C. § 402, may elect, in the time and manner prescribed by the retirement board and after receipt of proper notice, to have any portion of the distribution paid directly to another plan that is qualified under § 401(a) or 403(a), 26 U.S.C. § 403(a), of the code, or to an individual retirement account or annuity described in § 408(a) or (b) of the code, 26 U.S.C. § 408, in a direct rollover.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 40, § 1.

36-8-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 15, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 179, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 28, effective July 13, 2011.